Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Miscellaneous Procurement Provisions

45A.600.
Purchase of firearm by state employee — Use of proceeds from sale.

When an agency of Kentucky state government or a public university safety and security department organized pursuant to KRS

164.950

transitions from the use of one (1) firearm owned by that agency to another, the agency may sell the firearm that is being replaced directly to an employee of the agency if:

The firearm was issued to the employee in the course of employment; and

The employee is otherwise authorized by law to own or possess the firearm.

The agency shall notify employees of the intended replacement of firearms and that employees may purchase firearms pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection.

The employee desiring to purchase the firearm issued to the employee shall notify the head of the issuing agency of his or her intention not less than ten (10) days after receiving notice of the intended replacement.

Upon retirement from state employment, a state employee to whom a firearm has been issued during the course of employment may purchase the firearm which was issued during the course of employment if the employee is otherwise authorized to privately own or possess the firearm.

The employee desiring to purchase the firearm issued to the employee shall notify the head of the issuing agency of such intention not less than thirty (30) days prior to the scheduled date of retirement.

The purchase price shall be the fair market value determined by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, Division of Personal Property. The proceeds from the sale of the firearm shall be deposited to the credit of an agency account for the issuing agency and shall be used for the purpose of purchasing replacement firearms.

Any firearms that are not purchased by employees or retirees shall be disposed of pursuant to KRS

45A.047

.

This statute shall supersede other state laws with regard to the disposition of state property for the purpose stated in this section and for no other purpose.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 58, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2015 ch. 20, § 1, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

Acts 1986, ch. 58, § 2 provides: KRS

45A.600

shall be retroactive to January 1, 1985. An employee who retired on or after January 1, 1985 may, within sixty (60) days after July 15, 1986 apply to the agency from which he retired to purchase the handgun which was issued to him subject to the conditions of subsection (2) of KRS

45A.600

and the availability of the handgun.

45A.605.
Finance and Administration Cabinet’s authority to enter into contracts for “information highway” for state agencies — Mandatory use — Exceptions — Status as a state agency price contract — Access to contract by certain nonprofit schools, nonprofit organizations, and economic development entities.

As used in this section:

“Information highway” means a communication network for voice, data, and video communications technologies; and

“Agencies of the Commonwealth of Kentucky” includes all authorities; boards; commissions; councils; departments; program cabinets; the Kentucky Lottery Corporation; vocational schools; the Kentucky School for the Deaf; the Kentucky School for the Blind; upon written request of the Chief Justice, the Court of Justice; upon written request of the co-chairmen of the Legislative Research Commission, the General Assembly and the Legislative Research Commission; and upon written request of presidents, state institutions of higher education.

The provisions of any other law notwithstanding, the Finance and Administration Cabinet may enter into one (1) or more contracts, on behalf of agencies of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, with any person, partnership, or corporation that operates an information highway. The information highway shall enable the Commonwealth to benefit from cost-effective telecommunications technologies and shall provide opportunities for the private sector. These opportunities shall include but not be limited to the implementation of transactions and activities associated with the provision of telehealth by licensed health-care providers as provided in KRS Chapters 205, 211, 304.17A, 310, 311, 312, 313, 314, 314A, 315, 319, 319A, 320, 327, 334A, and 335.

Upon implementation, all agencies of the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall obtain all available communications services under contracts executed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, except as provided under subsection (4) of this section.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet may grant exceptions to the mandatory use of the information highway upon good cause shown.

Any contract awarded under subsection (2) of this section shall be deemed, for purposes of KRS

45A.050

, a state agency price contract to which all political subdivisions and state-licensed nonprofit institutions of higher education may have access and use on the same terms as agencies of the Commonwealth of Kentucky. In addition, nonprofit schools providing elementary or secondary education and nonprofit health care organizations shall be allowed to have access and use the contract on the same terms as agencies of the Commonwealth of Kentucky. “Nonprofit schools” and “nonprofit health care organizations” mean those schools and health care organizations which have been granted tax-exempt status under the United States Internal Revenue Code.

Any contract awarded under subsection (2) of this section shall be deemed a state agency price contract to which any entity that has been approved for economic development incentives under programs approved and administered by the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority may have access and use on the same terms as agencies of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

Any contract awarded under subsection (2) of this section shall be deemed a state agency price contract to which nonprofit organizations whose exclusive purpose is the delivery of services related to education, economic development, or cultural arts and humanities, may have access and use on the same terms as agencies of the Commonwealth of Kentucky. For the purposes of this section, “nonprofit organizations” means those organizations which have been granted tax-exempt status under Section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code or those existing education based entities whose purpose is the delivery of services to state school systems, their employees, or their governing organizations and which have been granted tax-exempt status under Section 501(c)(6) of the United States Internal Revenue Code.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 439, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 35, effective May 30, 1997; 2000, ch. 362, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 376, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 30, § 6, effective March 8, 2005; 2017 ch. 80, § 4, effective June 29, 2017.

45A.607.
Required contract provision restricting contractor from participating in certain boycott actions — Exceptions — Administrative regulations.

As used in this section:

“Boycott” means refusing to deal with, terminating business activities with, or otherwise taking any action that is intended to penalize, inflict economic harm on, or limit commercial relations with:

A jurisdiction with which Kentucky can enjoy open trade; or

A person or entity doing business with a jurisdiction with which Kentucky can enjoy open trade; but

“boycott” does not mean an action taken for bona fide business or economic reasons or that is specifically required by federal or state law; and

“Jurisdiction with which Kentucky can enjoy open trade” means:

Any World Trade Organization member; and

Any jurisdiction with which the United States has free trade or other agreements aimed at ensuring open and nondiscriminatory trade relations.

A governmental body shall not enter into a contract under this chapter with a contractor unless the contract includes a representation by the contractor that the contractor is not currently engaged in, and will not for the duration of the contract engage in, the boycott of a person or an entity based in or doing business with a jurisdiction with which Kentucky can enjoy open trade. This subsection shall not apply to a:

Contract with a value of less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000); or

Contractor who:

Is an individual; or

Employs five (5) or fewer employees.

A governmental body may terminate a contract with a contractor for:

A false representation made under subsection (2) of this section; or

Engaging in a boycott at the time of entering into the contract or during the duration of the contract.

A request for proposal, invitation to bid, or other document issued by a governmental body with the intent of soliciting responses for the potential award of a contract shall include notice of the requirements under this section.

The secretary shall promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A for the administration of this section.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 58, § 1, effective March 25, 2019.

45A.610.
Purchase of starch-based plastic garbage can liners by state agencies.

By January 1, 1991, a minimum of fifteen (15) percent of the purchases of garbage can liners by state agencies shall be starch-based plastic garbage can liners. The percentage shall increase by five (5) percent annually until fifty (50) percent of the purchase of garbage can liners are purchases of starch-based plastic garbage can liners.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 32, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2005, ch. 123, § 11, effective June 20, 2005.

45A.615.
Life-cycle cost comparison of heating, ventilation, and air conditioning equipment in state buildings.

On every bid for new construction or for upgrading existing facilities that is solicited under this chapter, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall require, where feasible, a life-cycle cost comparison of at least two (2) types of energy-efficient heating, ventilation, and air conditioning (HVAC) equipment, including geothermal equipment when feasible.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall give particular consideration in the awarding of a contract to energy-efficient HVAC equipment, including geothermal equipment when feasible, having a lower or lowest life-cycle cost, all other factors being equal.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 184, § 5, effective July 12, 2006.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/12/2006). 2006 Ky. Acts ch. 184, sec. 6 provides that KRS

45A.615

and KRS

152.710

to

152.725

shall be known as the Kentucky Energy Security National Leadership Act.

45A.620.
Preference to high-calcium foods and beverages in purchasing for school meals.

This section shall apply to any contract entered into by an agency or a business that contracts with a local school board, local school district, or other agency to provide food or meal services.

In addition to any requirements established by the United States Department of Agriculture under the National School Lunch Program, the School Breakfast Program, or other federally supported food service programs, an agency or business that provides food or meal services under contract with a local school board, local school district, or other agency shall give preference in purchasing contracts to high-calcium foods or beverages.

For the purposes of this section, the term “high-calcium foods or beverages” means foods or beverages that contain a higher level of calcium and that are equal to or lower in price than other products of the same type and quality.

Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, if the director of a program operated by an agency or business offering food or meal services on behalf of a local school board, local school district, or other agency determines that a high-calcium food or beverage would interfere with the proper treatment and care of an individual receiving services from the program, then the purchasing agent for that institution or business shall not be required to purchase a high-calcium food or beverage for that individual.

A purchasing agent who has entered into a contract with a supplier to purchase food or beverages before July 1, 2002, is not required to purchase high-calcium foods or beverages if purchasing those products would change the terms of the contract.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 168, § 1, effective July 15, 2002.

45A.625.
Procurement strategy for greater use of alternative fuel motor vehicles — Reports.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall develop a strategy to:

Replace at least fifty percent (50%) of the state-owned passenger vehicles and light-duty trucks managed by the Office of Fleet Management as of January 1, 2014, with:

New qualified hybrid motor vehicles as defined in 26

U.S.C. sec. 30

B;

New advanced lean burn technology motor vehicles as defined in 26

U.S.C. sec. 30

B;

New qualified fuel cell motor vehicles as defined in 26 U.S.C. sec. 30B; or

New qualified alternative fuel motor vehicles as defined in 26 U.S.C. sec. 30B; and

Increase the use of ethanol, cellulosic ethanol, biodiesel, and other alternative transportation fuels as defined in KRS

152.715

to reduce state government’s dependence on petroleum-based transportation fuels, where possible.

On or before December 1, 2013, and every December 1 thereafter, the cabinet shall report to the Legislative Research Commission:

The strategy for transitioning to motor vehicles outlined in subsection (1) of this section, including a life-cycle cost comparison, and a projected timetable to replace motor vehicles in the state motor pool as provided in subsection (1) of this section; and

The strategy for increased use of ethanol, cellulosic ethanol, biodiesel, and alternative transportation fuels, including the targeted amount and the dates by which these targets shall be achieved.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 34, effective August 30, 2007; repealed, reenact., and amend., Acts 2013, ch. 116, § 8, effective June 25, 2013; 2022 ch. 51, § 5, effective July 14, 2022.

45A.630.
Definitions for KRS 45A.035, 45A.095, 45A.630, and 45A.645.

As used in this section and KRS

45A.035

,

45A.095

, and

45A.645

:

“Agricultural product” means any unprocessed farm product raised or produced as a result of being in the business of “agriculture”, as defined by KRS

246.010

. “Agricultural product” does not include tobacco; and

“Kentucky-grown agricultural product” means any agricultural product raised or produced in Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 344, § 1, effective July 15, 2002.

45A.640.
Guidelines for use of procurement to support agricultural economy — Changes to administrative regulations and policies.

By January 1, 2003, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall issue guidelines to the various agencies identified by the Commissioner of Agriculture in KRS

260.035

directing the manner in which those agencies shall employ the state’s procurement process to support and encourage the growth of Kentucky’s agricultural economy. Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS Chapter 45A, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall make necessary changes to administrative regulations and cabinet policy in accordance with this section and KRS

45A.035

,

45A.095

, and

260.035

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 344, § 6, effective July 15, 2002.

45A.645.
Agencies to purchase Kentucky-grown products meeting quality standards and pricing requirements if available — Reports — Marketing assistance — Annual report — Vendors’ duties.

If purchasing agricultural products, state agencies, as defined by KRS

45A.505

, shall purchase Kentucky-grown agricultural products if the products are available and if the vendor can meet the applicable quality standards and pricing requirements of the state agency.

All state agencies that purchase agricultural products shall, on or before January 1 of each year, provide a report to the Legislative Research Commission and to the Department of Agriculture describing the types, quantities, and costs of each product purchased. The report shall be completed on a form provided by the department.

Prospective vendors of Kentucky-grown agricultural products may apply to the Kentucky Department of Agriculture for marketing assistance for the authorized use of logos or labeling statements to be used on Kentucky-grown agricultural products under KRS

260.017

, the Kentucky Proud™ Program.

Before a state agency may purchase Kentucky-grown agricultural products, the vendor shall be required to participate in the Kentucky Proud™ Program established by KRS

260.017

, and shall provide to the purchasing officer written certification that the agricultural products under consideration for purchase meet the definition of Kentucky-grown agricultural product.

All state agencies that purchase Kentucky-grown agricultural products shall, on or before January 1 of each year, provide a report to the Legislative Research Commission and to the Department of Agriculture describing the types, quantities, and costs of each product purchased. The report shall be completed on a form provided by the department.

If a contract is awarded to a vendor that supplies agricultural products that are raised or produced outside the United States or its territories, the vendor shall be required to identify the country in which the agricultural product was raised or produced if the vendor is the producer or packager of the product or if the vendor is not the producer or packager, provided the information is available to the vendor from the producer or packager of the product. The producer or packager shall clearly label that information on any containers or packages holding the product.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 344, § 7, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 244, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2008, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2009, ch. 37, § 1, effective June 25, 2009.

45A.650.
Purchases under $50 — Petty cash accounts.

Purchases of less than fifty dollars ($50), at the discretion of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, may be made on the open market by cash payment from petty cash accounts set aside for that purpose. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall determine the amount of the petty cash account of each state agency, and inspect the petty cash accounts at least once each year to ensure that the total, plus amount of receipts for the unreplenished disbursements, is equal to the fixed sum of cash set aside. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall make all necessary rules and regulations governing use and replenishment of petty cash funds. An agency shall not split or parcel purchases over a period of time to evade the provisions of this section or applicable regulations. If purchases are so split or parceled, the agency head is liable for the amount authorized to be expended. In the case of a shortage in a petty cash account, the agency head is liable for the amount of the shortage.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 496, § 6, effective July 13, 1990.

45A.655.
Imprest cash funds.

Subject to the provisions of this code, any budget unit may establish one (1) or more imprest cash funds when provided for by appropriation or when authorized by the Finance and Administration Cabinet for the purpose of making disbursements requiring prompt cash outlay, and to carry out the provisions of this code. The State Treasurer, upon warrants of the Finance and Administration Cabinet based upon a requisition from the head of the budget unit, shall pay to the head of the budget unit the amount necessary to establish a fund.

A custodian shall be designated by the head of the budget unit and, after appropriate instruction and testing, certified by the Finance and Administration Cabinet as qualified to administer the fund. The custodian shall file with the Finance and Administration Cabinet a schedule of the disbursements from the fund as often as may be necessary to replenish the fund and at least once each month. The schedule of disbursements shall be accompanied by appropriate vouchers and statements of indebtedness therefor approved by the head of the budget unit, and by a certificate as to the condition of the fund. The amount of the total of the approved voucher shall be paid to the custodian of the fund on the warrant of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, and the amount shall be devoted to reimbursement of the fund. Any question relative to the amount to be allowed in any imprest cash fund, the expenditure thereof, the accounting thereof, and the repayment thereof to the State Treasurer, shall be determined by the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

The agency head shall be responsible for expenditures authorized from the funds, and the custodian shall be responsible for administration of the fund. Each agency head and custodian shall be separately bonded in the amount by which the total authorization for the fund exceeds the state blanket bond for such officials.

A post audit of each imprest fund shall be conducted as required by KRS

43.050

.

Each imprest fund shall lapse with the appropriation on which it is based but may be reestablished by appropriation for the next ensuing year or when authorized by the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

If work not subject to the provisions of the law for competitive bidding is done on public projects by the state through the use of its own personnel or facilities in whole or in part, the budget unit having the work performed may, when authorized by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, establish an imprest cash fund for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the proposed project. This fund shall not exceed at any time an amount equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the anticipated total cost of the project.

Imprest cash funds may be authorized by the Finance and Administration Cabinet to operate within the unified and integrated system of accounts, as defined in KRS

45.305

. These funds shall allow agencies to record expenses into the statewide system and to write the check at the agency site. The reimbursement and reconciliation processes shall be performed by the Treasurer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 496, § 7, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 118, § 19, effective July 15, 1998.

45A.657.
Required use of public funds for election administration.

All costs and expenses related to election administration shall be paid for with public funds.

An employee of a governmental body shall not solicit, take, or otherwise accept any private contribution, donation, or anything of value to assist with election administration within this state. This subsection shall not apply to a lawful contract for goods and services or an acceptance of food or nonalcoholic beverages.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2022).
2022 Ky. Acts ch, 23, sec. 6, provided that Act, which created this statute, may be cited as the Stop Outside Influence Over Elections Act of 2022.

45A.660.
Waiver of requirements on purchase from government.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet may, for satisfactory reason consistent with its responsibility to attempt in every practical way to ensure that state agencies are acquiring their real needs through the application of best value criteria, waive any requirements of this code in instances where purchases are made by the Commonwealth of Kentucky or any agency thereof from the federal government or any agency thereof or from any other state government or any agency thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 496, § 8, effective July 13, 1990; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 32, effective May 30, 1997.

45A.665.
Definitions for KRS 45A.665 to 45A.685.

“Agency” means any office, department, bureau, or other institution in Kentucky state government which awards contracts for purchase of property, goods, or services;

“Cabinet” means the Finance and Administration Cabinet;

“Small or small minority business set aside” means a purchase or contract request for which bids are to be invited and accepted only from small or small minority businesses by the cabinet;

“Small or small minority business” shall be defined by the administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 496, § 9, effective July 13, 1990.

45A.670.
Regulations relating to small or small minority businesses.

The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations defining standards regarding classifications and definitions of small or small minority businesses as they relate to KRS

45A.670

to

45A.685

. These regulations may be adjusted as needed by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet in order to insure proper classification of small or small minority businesses.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 496, § 10, effective July 13, 1990.

45A.675.
Small or small minority business set aside.

The cabinet shall designate as small or small minority business set aside state contracts of goods, equipment, construction, or services requested to be purchased by or for any agency whenever there is a reasonable expectation that bids can be obtained from at least three (3) small or small minority businesses capable of furnishing the desired property or services at a fair and reasonable price. Such designation should be made prior to the public notice for bids, and the notice shall designate this invitation as a small or small minority business set aside.

When an item has been designated as a small or small minority business set aside, invitations for bids shall be confined to small or small minority businesses and bids from other bidders may be rejected.

The cabinet shall award contracts to the responsible bidder whose bid meets specifications and offers the best value to the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 496, § 11, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 120, § 15, effective July 15, 1998.

45A.680.
Withdrawal of designation of small or small minority business set aside.

If less than three (3) small or small minority businesses are considered capable of meeting the specifications and terms of the invitations for bids, or if the cabinet determines that the lowest and best bid results in an unreasonable price, the agency shall reject all bids and withdraw the designation of small or small minority business set aside. Notification of reasons for rejection shall be given to bidders. The cabinet may then seek additional bids without reference to the small or small minority business designation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 496, § 12, effective July 13, 1990.

45A.685.
Short title.

The provisions of KRS

45A.665

to

45A.685

may be cited as the Kentucky Small or Small Minority Business Purchasing Act.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 496, § 13, effective July 13, 1990.

45A.690.
Definitions for KRS 45A.690 to 45A.725.

As used in KRS

45A.690

to

45A.725

:

“Committee” means the Government Contract Review Committee of the Legislative Research Commission;

“Contracting body” means each state board, bureau, commission, department, division, authority, university, college, officer, or other entity, except the Legislature, authorized by law to contract for personal services. “Contracting body” includes the Tourism Development Finance Authority with regard to tax incentive agreements;

“Governmental emergency” means an unforeseen event or set of circumstances that creates an emergency condition as determined by the committee by promulgation of an administrative regulation;

“Memorandum of agreement” means any memorandum of agreement, memorandum of understanding, program administration contract, interlocal agreement to which the Commonwealth is a party, privatization contract, or similar device relating to services between a state agency and any other governmental body or political subdivision of the Commonwealth or entity qualified as nonprofit under 26

U.S.C. sec. 501(c)(3)

not authorized under KRS Chapter 65 that involves an exchange of resources or responsibilities to carry out a governmental function. It includes agreements by regional cooperative organizations formed by local boards of education or other public educational institutions for the purpose of providing professional educational services to the participating organizations and agreements with Kentucky Distinguished Educators pursuant to KRS

158.782

. This definition does not apply to:

Agreements between the Transportation Cabinet and any political subdivision of the Commonwealth for road and road-related projects;

Agreements between the Auditor of Public Accounts and any other governmental agency or political subdivision of the Commonwealth forauditing services;

Agreements between state agencies as required by federal or state law;

Agreements between state agencies and state universities or colleges only when the subject of the agreement does not result in the use of an employee or employees of a state university or college by a state agency to fill a position or perform a duty that an employee or employees of state government could perform if hired, and agreements between state universities or colleges and employers of students in the Commonwealth work-study program sponsored by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority;

Agreements involving child support collections and enforcement;

Agreements with public utilities, providers of direct Medicaid health care to individuals except for any health maintenance organization or other entity primarily responsible for administration of any program or system of Medicaid managed health care services established by law or by agreement with the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, and transit authorities;

Nonfinancial agreements;

Any obligation or payment for reimbursement of the cost of corrective action made pursuant to KRS

224.60-140

;

Exchanges of confidential personal information between agencies;

Agreements between state agencies and rural concentrated employment programs; or

Any other agreement that the committee deems inappropriate for consideration;

“Motion picture or entertainment production” means the same as defined in KRS

154.61-010

;

“Multicontract” means a group of personal service contracts between a contracting body and individual vendors providing the same or substantially similar services to the contracting body that, for purposes of the committee, are treated as one (1) contract;

“Nurse aide” means an individual who has successfully completed the nurse aide training and competency evaluation program and may include a nursing student, medication aide, or a person employed through a health care services agency as defined in KRS

216.718

who provides nursing or nursing-related services to a resident in a nursing facility, excluding:

An individual who is a licensed health professional;

A volunteer who provides the nursing or nursing-related services without monetary compensation; or

A person who is hired by the resident or family to sit with the resident and who does not perform nursing or nursing-related services;

“Personal service contract” means an agreement whereby an individual, firm, partnership, or corporation is to perform certain services requiring professional skill or professional judgment for a specified period of time at a price agreed upon. It includes all price contracts for personal services between a governmental body or political subdivision of the Commonwealth and any other entity in any amount. This definition does not apply to:

Agreements between the Department of Parks and a performing artist or artists for less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) per fiscal year per artist or artists;

Agreements with public utilities, foster care parents, providers of direct Medicaid health care to individuals except for any health maintenance organization or other entity primarily responsible for administration ofany program or system of Medicaid managed health care services established by law or by agreement with the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, individuals performing homemaker services, and transit authorities;

Agreements between state universities or colleges and employers of students in the Commonwealth work study program sponsored by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority;

Agreements between a state agency and rural concentrated employment programs;

Agreements between the State Fair Board and judges, officials, and entertainers contracted for events promoted by the State Fair Board;

Agreements between the Department of Public Advocacy and attorneys for the representation of indigent clients who are entitled to representation under KRS Chapter 31 and who, by reason of conflict or otherwise, cannot be represented by the department, subject to quarterly reports of all such agreements to the committee;

Agreements between the Office of Kentucky Veterans’ Centers and licensed nurses and nurse aides in order to provide critically needed long-term care to Kentucky veterans who are residents in state veterans’ nursing homes pursuant to KRS

40.325

; or

Any other contract that the committee deems inappropriate for consideration;

“Tax incentive agreement” means an agreement executed under KRS

154.61-030

; and

“Tourism Development Finance Authority” means the authority established by KRS

148.850

.

Compliance with the provisions of KRS

45A.690

to

45A.725

does not dispense with the requirements of any other law necessary to make the personal service contract or memorandum of agreement valid.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 496, § 14, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 486, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 107, effective June 20, 2005; 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 48, effective June 26, 2009; 2010, ch. 55, § 3, effective April 5, 2010; 2012, ch. 151, § 6, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 39, § 2, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 118, § 3, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 156, § 21, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 110, § 8, effective July 14, 2022.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A contract for employment of an executive director by a public agency, the Kentucky Housing Corporation, is a personal services contract, as the agreement contains contractual terms which satisfy all elements of the statutory definition of personal service contract as that phrase is defined by subdivision (1)(d) (now (1)(f)) of this section and most importantly, provides for performance of duties for a specified period of time.

OAG 92-18

.